Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB429.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 6.691 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure and the Kentucky Rules of Evidence shall
apply to all commission adjudicatory hearings. All testimony in a commission
adjudicatory proceeding shall be under oath. All parties shall have the right to call
and examine witnesses, to introduce exhibits, to cross-examine witnesses, to submit
evidence, and to be represented by counsel and any other due process rights,
privileges, and responsibilities of a witness appearing before the courts of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky. Before testifying, all witnesses shall be given a copy
of the regulations governing commission proceedings. All witnesses shall be
entitled to be represented by counsel.
(2) Any person whose name is mentioned during adjudicatory proceedings of the
commission and who may be adversely affected thereby may appear personally
before the commission on the person's own behalf, with or without attorney, to give
a statement in opposition to such adverse mention or file a written statement of that
opposition for incorporation into the record of proceeding.
(3) All adjudicatory proceedings of the commission carried out pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall be public, unless the members vote to go into
executive session in accordance with KRS 61.810.
(4) Within thirty (30) days after the end of an adjudicatory proceeding pursuant to the
provisions of this section, the commission shall meet in executive session for the
purpose of reviewing the evidence before it. Within thirty (30) days after
completion of deliberations, the commission shall publish a written report of its
findings and conclusions which shall be based on whether the person accused has
complied with the statute as written.
(5) No penalty provided for in this section shall be imposed except as the result of an
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2025 2:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1341
adjudicatory proceeding held upon the filing of a complaint. Notwithstanding the
administrative penalties provided for in KRS 6.797, 6.807, and 6.821, the
commission, upon a finding pursuant to an adjudicatory proceeding that there has
been clear and convincing proof of a violation of this code, may:
(a) Issue an order requiring the violator to cease and desist the violation;
(b) Issue an order requiring the violator to file any report, statement, or other
information as required by this code;
(c) In writing, publicly reprimand the violator for potential violations of the law
and provide a copy of the reprimand to the presiding officer of the house in
which the alleged violator serves;
(d) In writing, recommend to the house in which the violator serves that the
violator be sanctioned as recommended by the commission, which may
include a recommendation for censure or expulsion;
(e) Issue an order requiring the violator to pay a civil penalty of not more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000)[two thousand dollars ($2,000)]; or
(f) Revoke the registration of any legislative agent or employer for a period not
to exceed five (5) years. During the period of the revocation, the agent or
employer or any other entity which constitutes nothing more than the
legislative agent or employer operating under a different name or identity
shall not be permitted to register as a legislative agent or employer.
(6) The commission may refer to the Attorney General, county attorney, or
Commonwealth's attorney of the appropriate jurisdiction, for prosecution evidence
of criminal violations of this code. The Attorney General shall have responsibility
for all prosecutions under the law and may request from the commission all
evidence collected in its investigation.
(7) Findings of fact or final determinations by the commission that a violation of this
code has been committed, or any testimony related to the commission's findings of
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2025 2:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1341
fact or final determinations, shall not be admissible in criminal proceedings in the
courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky. Evidence collected by the commission
may be used in a criminal proceeding if otherwise relevant.
(8) Any person found by the commission to have committed a violation of this code
may appeal the action to the Franklin Circuit Court. The appeal shall be initiated
within thirty (30) days after the date of the final action of the commission by filing
a petition with the court against the commission. The commission shall transmit to
the clerk of the court all evidence considered by the commission at the public
hearing. The court shall hear the appeal upon the record as certified by the
commission.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/6/2025 2:14 PM Jacketed